Utah statutes.
76-6-412.5.   Property damage caused in the course of committing a theft.
If a defendant who commits or attempts to commit theft as defined in Section
76-6-404 of regulated metal as defined in Section 76-10-901 and in the course
of committing or attempting to commit the theft causes damage to any person's
real or personal property other than the regulated metal, the defendant is
liable for restitution for all costs incurred due to the damage to the
person's property.
